Washington statutes.
RCW 4.44.090

Questions of fact for jury.

All questions of fact other than those mentioned in RCW 4.44.080, shall be decided by the jury, and all evidence thereon addressed to them.

[Code 1881 s 224; 1877 p 47 s 228; 1869 p 56 s 228; RRS s 343.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. ER 1008.

Charging juries: State Constitution Art. 4 s 16.

Right to trial by jury: State Constitution Art. 1 s 21; RCW 4.48.010.